Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.470

Rural partial-county library districts.

A rural partial-county library district may be created in a portion of the unincorporated area of a county as provided in this section if a rural county library district, intercounty rural library district, or island library district has not been created in the county.

The procedure to create a rural partial-county library district is initiated by the filing of petitions with the county auditor proposing the creation of the district that have been signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters residing in the area proposed to be included in the rural partial-county library district. The county auditor shall review the petitions and certify the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures to the county legislative authority.

If the petitions are certified as having sufficient valid signatures, the county legislative authority shall hold a public hearing on the proposed rural partial-county library district, may adjust the boundaries of the proposed district, and may cause a ballot proposition to be submitted to the voters of the proposed rural partial-county library district authorizing its creation if the county legislative authority finds that the creation of the rural partial-county library district is in the public interest. A subsequent public hearing shall be held if additional territory is added to the proposed rural partial-county library district by action of the county legislative authority.

The rural partial-county library district shall be created if the ballot proposition authorizing the creation of the district is approved by a simple majority vote of the voters voting on the proposition. Immediately after creation of the rural partial-county library district the county legislative authority shall appoint a board of library trustees for the district as provided under RCW 27.12.190.

Except as provided in this section, a rural partial-county library district is subject to all the provisions of law applicable to a rural county library district and shall have all the powers, duties, and authorities of a rural county library district, including, but not limited to, the authority to impose property taxes, incur debt, and annex a city or town with a population of less than one hundred thousand at the time of the annexation that is located in the same county as the rural partial-county library district.

Adjacent unincorporated territory in the county may be annexed to a rural partial-county library district in the same manner as territory is annexed to a water-sewer district, except that an annexation is not subject to potential review by a boundary review board.

If, at the time of creation, a rural partial-county library district has an assessed valuation of less than fifty million dollars, it may provide library services only by contracting for the services through an interlocal agreement with an adjacent library district, or an adjacent city or town that maintains its own library. If the assessed valuation of the rural partial-county library district subsequently reaches fifty million dollars as a result of annexation or appreciation, the fifty million dollar limitation shall not apply.

If a ballot proposition is approved creating a rural county library district in the county, every rural partial-county library district in that county shall be dissolved and its assets and liabilities transferred to the rural county library district. Where a rural partial-county library district has annexed a city or town, the voters of the city or town shall be allowed to vote on the proposed creation of a rural county library district and, if created, the rural county library district shall include each city and town that was annexed to the rural partial-county library district.

Nothing in this section authorizes the consolidation of a rural partial-county library district with any rural county library district; island library district; city, county, or regional library; intercounty library district; or other rural partial-county library district, unless, in addition to any other requirements imposed by statute, the boards of all library districts involved approve the consolidation.

[ 1999 c 153 s 25; 1994 c 198 s 2; 1993 c 284 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.